tests/irreg-vowelharmony.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] some nouns, suffixes starting in vowels":
    saat<n><dat> : saate
    saat<n><px3sp><nom> : saati
    dikkat<n><dat> : dikkate
    dikkat<n><px3sp><nom> : dikkati
    idrak<n><dat> : idrake
    idrak<n><px3sp><nom> : idraki
    harf<n><dat> : harfe
    harf<n><px3sp><nom> : harfi
    terminal<n><dat> : terminale
    terminal<n><px3sp><nom> : terminali
    festival<n><dat> : festivale
    festival<n><px3sp><nom> : festivali

  "[twol] some nouns, suffixes starting in consonants":
    saat<n><pl><nom> : saatler
    saat<n><nom>+i<cop><aor><p2><sg> : saatsin
    dikkat<n><pl><nom> : dikkatler
    dikkat<n><nom>+i<cop><aor><p2><sg> : dikkatsin
    idrak<n><pl><nom> : idrakler
    idrak<n><nom>+i<cop><aor><p2><sg> : idraksin
    harf<n><pl><nom> : harfler
    harf<n><nom>+i<cop><aor><p2><sg> : harfsin
    terminal<n><pl><nom> : terminaller
    terminal<n><nom>+i<cop><aor><p2><sg> : terminalsin
    festival<n><pl><nom> : festivaller
    festival<n><nom>+i<cop><aor><p2><sg> : festivalsin

  "[twol] an adjective":
    meşgul<adj><subst><pl><nom> : meşguller
    meşgul<adj><subst><dat> : meşgule
    meşgul<adj><subst><px3sp><nom> : meşgulü

  "[twol] interaction with 'devoicing', suffixes starting in vowels":
    kalp<n><dat> : kalbe
    kalp<n><px3sp><nom> : kalbi
    harp<n><dat> :  harbe
    harp<n><px3sp><nom> : harbi

  "[twol] interaction with 'devoicing', suffixes starting in consonants":
    kalp<n><pl><nom> : kalpler
    kalp<n><nom>+i<cop><aor><p2><sg> : kalpsin
    harp<n><pl><nom> :  harpler
    harp<n><nom>+i<cop><aor><p2><sg> : harpsin

  "[twol] interaction with epenthesis":
    vakit<n><nom> : vakit
    vakit<n><acc> : vakti
    vakit<n><px2pl><nom> : vaktiniz
    vakit<n><dat> : vakte
    vakit<n><loc> : vakitte
    vakit<n><px3sp><nom> : vakti
    vakit<n><px3sp><acc> : vaktini
    vakit<n><px3sp><dat> : vaktine
    vakit<n><px3sp><loc> : vaktinde
